test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    saheliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sahheel
    saigiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saigiim
    sajaidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajaiditám
    sajaldittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajalditám
    sajostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sajostitám
    sajâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saajâd
    salbâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saalbâst
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salkkiim
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sälkkee
    salliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salliim
    salliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sällee
    salttiistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: salttist
    salttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salttiim
    salttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kyele
    salttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sälttee
    saneeristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saneeristám
    sanniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sanniim
    sanniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sännee
    sappadistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sappadistám
    sappadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sappad
    sapâristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sapâristám
    sargâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sargâs
    sargâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saargâst
    sarâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saarât
    satâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saatâš
    savadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savadit
    savestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savveest
    savjâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savjâd
    savâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saavvâst
    savŋelittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savŋelitám
    savŋiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: savŋiim
    saŋadittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋadit
    saŋediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋŋeed
    sačâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saaččâl
    seettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siäđám
    seettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siätá
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävám
    seevviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävá
    segidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seeggid
    sehhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sehhiim
    sehhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sehhee
    seiliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: seiliim
    seiliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seilee
    selgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seelgât
    selvâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seelvât
    selâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seelât
    servidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: servid
    sesâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sesâlistám
    seviliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevvil
    sevtildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevtild
    sevđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevđijd
    sevŋâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävŋân
    seđŋiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siäđŋám
    siebliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sieblee
    sieptiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sieptiim
    sierriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierriim
    sierriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sierree
    sierâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sierâd
    sierânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sierânistám
    sihostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sihhoost
    sihtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sihtiim
    sihtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sihtee
    sijgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sijgod
    sijgâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sijgâd
    silbiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: silbiim
    silbiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: silbee
    silliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: silliim
    silliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sillee
    sinjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siinjârd
    sirdâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siirdâš
    siskediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siskeed
    siskeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siskeeld
    siskálmittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siskálmitám
    siveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siiveeld
    sivâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siivâst
    siäiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siäilut
    siälgádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siälgád
    siärgádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siärgád
    siävustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävust
    siävuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävvut
    siävŋuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävŋut
    siävŋánittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siävŋánitám
    siävŋášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siävŋáš
    siđârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siiđârd
    skaađiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skääđee
    skainiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skainiim
    skainiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skäinee
    skalijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skaalijd
    skalmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skalmiim
    skalmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skälmee
    skarttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skarttiim
    skarttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skärttee
    skavadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skaavaad
    skačâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skačâlitám
    skeikkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiäikám
    skeikkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiäikká
    skelmušiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skelmuš
    skemmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skemmiim
    skerčijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeerčijd
    skerčádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčáiditám
    skerčádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skerčádittiđ
    skerčáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčáiditám
    skerčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skerčâgitám
    skerčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeerčâg
    skeŋkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skeŋkkiim
    skeŋkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeŋkkee
    skihtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skihtiim
    skihtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skihtee
    skilettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiileet
    skilijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiilijd
    skilottuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skilottutám
    skiláidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiláiditám
    skircettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skircceet
    skirnádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skirnáád
    skirviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skirviittâm
    skitârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiittârd
    skiärustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiärrust
    skižestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiižeest
    skičijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiičijd
    skiđármistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiđármistám
    skiđârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiiđârd
    skolijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoolijd
    skolkkâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skolkkâl
    skovijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoovijd
    skovviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuávvee
    skođâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoođâst
    skuiperdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuiperd
    skuirâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuirâg
    skuljiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuljiim
    skuljiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuljee
    skulliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skulliim
    skulliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skullee
    skulčottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skulččoot
    skummiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skummiim
    skuppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuppiim
    skurnáttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skurnáát
    skurčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuurčâg
    skuvgááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuvgát
    skuvgâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuvgâl
    skuvriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuvriim
    skuáibááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuáibát
    skuálkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuálhám
    skuálkuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuálkut
    skuápálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuápálitám
    skuávhádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuávhád
    skuávkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skuávhám
    skuávkkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuávkkát
    skuážurdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuážžurd
    skužestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skužžeest
    skuđálgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuđáálg
    skučálistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skučálistám
    skučâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuččâg
    skyennidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skyennid
    skávustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáávust
    smakkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smakkiim
    smakkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smäkkee
    smavviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smavviim
    smavviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smävvee
    smavâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smaavvâd
    smierettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiereet
    smietâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiettâd
    smiärgááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smiärgát
    smolkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: smolkkiim
    smolkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: smuálkkee
    snaittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snaittiim
    snaittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snäittee
    snelkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snelkkiim
    snielâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snielâhistám
    sniljáástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sniljást
    snipottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snippoot
    snjagottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snjaggoot
    snjirriittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snjirrit
    snjogâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snjooggâst
    snorâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snoorrân
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: snuittiim
    snuittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuittee
    snuotârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuotârd
    snuvlâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuuvlâg
    sodâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooddâst
    soggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soggiim
    soggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suággee
    soggâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soggân
    sogâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooggâd
    sohâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sohâlut
    soicettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooicet
    soijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soijiim
    soijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saijee
    soinâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooinâd
    soivâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soivâl
    sojâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soojâš
    sollâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sollâd
    solâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soolâst
    somijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soomijd
    sondiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sondiim
    sondiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suándee
    sonnâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sonnâlist
    sooijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soijiim
    sooijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saijee
    sorjottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sorjoot
    sormediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sormed
    sovestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovveest
    sovsâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovsâlutám
    sovášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovááš
    sovâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovât
    sovčettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovččeet
    sovčádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soovčád
    sovđâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sovđâd
    soŋottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sooŋoot
    spaihâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spaaihâst
    sparrodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sparrod
    spejâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: speejâld
    spejâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spejâlist
    spelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spelliim
    spelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spellee
    spiekâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiekkâst
    spijliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spijliim
    spižžiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spižžiim
    spižžiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spižžee
    sponttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sponttiim
    sponttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spuánttee
    spooviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: spooviim
    spooviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spoovee
    sporijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spoorijd
    sporkkâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sporkkâl
    sporriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sporriim
    sporriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spuárree
    spuáhuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spuáhut
    späigiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spáigá
    srappiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: srappiim
    srappiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sräppee
    sreeviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sreeviim
    srijkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: srijkkiim
    sruuviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sruuviim
    sruuviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sruuvee
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: staaviim
    staaviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stäävee
    stajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: staajeed
    stalliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stalliim
    stalliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ställee
    standiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: standiim
    standiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ständee
    stappiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stappiim
    stappiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stäppee
    stapâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stapâlistám
    stavâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stavâlist
    steikkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: steikkiim
    stelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stelliim
    stelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stellee
    stemppâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stemppâlistám
    stergiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stergiim
    stergiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stergee
    stergâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: steergâg
    sterilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sterilistám
    steŋgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: steŋgiim
    steŋgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: steŋgee
    stilčottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stilččoot
    stirccááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stirccát
    stivriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stivriim
    stivriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stivree
    stiämmááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stiämmát
    stokkádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stokkád
    stondiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stondiim
    stuimáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuuimásk
    stuljiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuljiim
    stuljiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuljee
    stulčádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stulččáád
    sturccâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sturccâd
    stuárášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuárráš
    stuŋgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuŋgit
    styerediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: styereed
    stálpástittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stálpástitám
    stávrudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stáávrud
    stávruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stáávrut
    stäjediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stääjeed
    stäjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stääjid
    suddodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suddod
    suddâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suddâd
    suddâluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suddâlutám
    sujâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suujâd
    sujâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suujât
    suládiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sulláád
    sulâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sulâstit
    summiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: summiim
    summiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: summee
    sundediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sundeed
    sundestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sundeest
    suogârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suoggârd
    suoijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoijiim
    suoijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syeijee
    suoiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoiniim
    suoiniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syeinee
    suoivânistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoivânistám
    suojâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suoijâl
    suollâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suollâgitám
    suomâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suomâst
    suonjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suonjârd
    suonniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syennee
    suoppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suoppiim
    suoppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syeppee
    suopâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suopâlistám
    suorgiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgit
    suorgâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suorgât
    suotkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syetkee
    suotâstittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suotâstitám
    suovâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suovâst
    suptâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suptâd
    surmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: surmiim
    surmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sormee
    sutettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sutteet
    suttâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suttâd
    sutâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suuttâd
    suvrâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suuvrâst
    suvčâgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suvčâgitám
    suvčâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suuvčâg
    suábbádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suábbád
    suábástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suábbást
    suáibildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáibild
    suáibuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáibut
    suáittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suáitám
    suájádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suájáád
    suálmudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suálmud
